West Virginia, session 2025, HB2261.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 20, 2024, authorized under the authority of §60-7-10 of this code, relating to the Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner (private club licensing, 175 CSR 02), is authorized.